Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1991.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 461, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 461. A. If the defendant is brought before a
magistrate of another county for the purpose of giving bail, the
magistrate must proceed in respect thereto, in the same manner as if
the defendant had been brought before him the magistrate upon a
warrant of arrest, and the same proceedings may be had thereon.
B. If a defendant is confined in a county jail, municipal jail,
or a jail operated by a regional jail authority, and the defendant
has a request to hold in custody from another jurisdiction within
the state, the defendant may post a bond in the other jurisdiction
to release the hold. Upon proof that a bond has been posted, the
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1991 Page 1

requ est to hold in custody from the other jurisdiction shall be
released.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate













ENGR. H. B. NO. 1991 Page 2